Utah statutes.
63H-1-401 (Superseded 10/01/09).   Preparation of project area plan --
Required contents of project area plan.
(1) (a)  Before spending any funds in a project area or entering into any
lease or development agreement, the authority board shall adopt a project area
plan as provided in this part.
(b)  In order to adopt a project area plan, the authority board shall:
(i)  prepare a draft project area plan;
(ii)  give notice as required under Subsection 63H-1-402(2);
(iii)  hold at least one public meeting, as required under Subsection
63H-1-402(1); and
(iv)  after holding at least one public meeting and subject to Subsection
(1)(c), adopt the draft project area plan as the project area plan.
(c)  Before adopting a draft project area plan as the project area plan, the
authority board may make modifications to the draft project area plan that the
board considers necessary or appropriate.
(d)  The authority board may not adopt a project area plan unless at least one
of the board members appointed under Subsection 63I-1-302(2)(b) is a mayor or
member of the legislative body of a municipality that is adjacent or in close
proximity to the project area described in the project area plan proposed to
be adopted.
(2)  Each project area plan and draft project area plan shall contain:
(a)  a legal description of the boundaries of the project area that is the
subject of the project area plan;
(b)  the authority's purposes and intent with respect to the project area; and
(c)  the board's findings and determination that:
(i)  there is a need to effectuate a public purpose;
(ii)  there is a public benefit to the proposed development project;
(iii)  it is economically sound and feasible to adopt and carry out the
project area plan; and
(iv)  carrying out the project area plan will promote the public peace,
health, safety, and welfare of the community in which the project area is
located.
